Maine, session 132, LD1137.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §159-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2015, c. 20, §1, is further
amended to read:
B. "Recreational or harvesting activities" means recreational activities conducted out-
of-doors, including, but not limited to, hunting, fishing, trapping, sport shooting,
camping, environmental education and research, hiking, rock climbing, ice climbing,
bouldering, rappelling, recreational caving, sight-seeing, operating snow-traveling and
all-terrain vehicles, skiing, hang-gliding, noncommercial aviation activities, dog
sledding, equine activities, boating, sailing, canoeing, rafting, biking, picnicking,
swimming or activities involving the harvesting or gathering of forest, field or marine
products. It includes entry of, volunteer maintenance and improvement of, use of and
passage over premises in order to pursue these activities. "Recreational or harvesting
activities" does not include commercial agricultural or timber harvesting.
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §159-A, sub-§1, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. "Sport shooting" means engaging in archery, skeet and trap shooting or other
similar shooting sports and the shooting of rifles, shotguns and pistols.